Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.111

City attorney—Duties.

The city attorney shall advise the city authorities and officers in all legal matters pertaining to the business of the city and shall approve all ordinances as to form. He or she shall represent the city in all actions brought by or against the city or against city officials in their official capacity. He or she shall perform such other duties as the city council by ordinance may direct.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2049; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.110. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 26; 1893 c 70 s 11; 1890 p 192 s 132; RRS s 9140. Formerly RCW 35.24.110.]

NOTES:

Employment of legal interns: RCW 35.21.760.